Utah statutes.
63G-6-701 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Policy regarding architect-engineer services.

It is the policy of this state to publicly announce all requirements for architect-engineer services and to negotiate contracts for architect-engineer services on the basis of demonstrated competence and qualification for the type of services required, and at fair and reasonable prices.  Architect-engineer services shall be procured as provided in this part except as authorized by Sections 63G-6-409 through 63G-6-411.  This part does not affect the authority of, and does not apply to procedures undertaken by, a public procurement unit to obtain the services of architects or engineers in the capacity of employees of such unit.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

